North Carolina, session 2025, SB200.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the North Carolina
Housing Trust Fund the sum of one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be administered in accordance with the provisions of
Chapter 122E of the General Statutes in those North Carolina counties designated before, on, or
after the effective date of this act under a major disaster declaration by the President of the United
States under the Stafford Act (P.L. 93-288) as a result of Hurricane Helene.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S200-v-1*